District of Columbia statutes.
11-1747

Delegation of authority.

The Executive Officer and court officers appointed by the Executive Officer may delegate to their subordinates authority and responsibility to perform the functions vested in them by law.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 515, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(95), 108 Stat. 713

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1747.
1973 Ed., § 11-1747.

Editor's Notes

Revision of chapter: Pub. L. 99-650 revised this chapter effective 180 days from November 14, 1986. The revision retained subject matter, with amendments, set out in former §§ 11-1901, 11-1903, 11-1905 and 11-1906 in present §§ 11-1906, 11-1911, 11-1912, and 11-1916. No detailed explanation of the change made by the 1986 Act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to the former sections have been added to corresponding sections in the revised chapter.